Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB129.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 704(a), (b), (d) and (f) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 704. Advisory councils for veterans' homes.(a) Establishment of advisory council.--There is hereby established an advisory council for each veterans' home operated by the Commonwealth to provide stakeholders with a means to advise the Adjutant General on the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in veterans' homes to ensure high-quality health care and well-being for residents of veterans' homes. Each advisory council shall consist of 15 members and the Adjutant General or the 123456789101112131415161718 Adjutant General's designee, who shall serve ex officio. [Twelve of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by the Pennsylvania War Veterans' Council.] The following shall apply:(1) Ten of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by the Pennsylvania War Veterans' Council. Appointees under this paragraph shall be veterans from the local community of the veterans' home.(2) Three of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by current residents of the veterans' home and shall include a family member of a current or former resident of the veterans' home.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President pro tempore of the Senate shall each appoint one member from their respective bodies to serve on each council. [The remaining member on the advisory council shall be selected by the residents of the veterans' homes.](4) The department shall designate a subject matter expert to attend each advisory council's meeting to provide input on the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in each veterans' home.(b) Term of office and officers.--(1) Each member of the councils appointed from the General Assembly shall serve for the duration of that General Assembly. [The eight] Except as provided under paragraph (2), the thirteen members appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of three [years, provided that the initial eight members selected by the Governor shall serve as follows: three 20250SB0129PN1013 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members for one year, three members for two years and two members for three years as designated by the Governor.] years.(2) The initial thirteen members selected by the Governor on or after the effective date of this paragraph shall serve as follows: four members for one year, four members for two years and five members for three years as designated by the Governor.(3) Each council shall organize as soon as possible and shall annually elect a president, vice president and secretary from the voting members.* * *(d) Quorum and time of meetings.--[Six] Eight members of a council shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the council. Each advisory council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times at the call of the president. Each advisory council shall conduct meetings in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).* * *(f) Power and duty of advisory councils.--Each veterans' home advisory council shall advise the Adjutant General as to the resident care, management, operation and the [adequacy] compliance of facilities and services at their respective homes.(g) Annual reports.--Each advisory council shall submit an annual report to the department that identifies the work of the advisory council, includes an overall assessment of the resident care, manag ement, operations and compliance of facilities and services in each veterans' home and provides recommendations. The department shall submit a consolidated report on the annual reports submitted by each advisory council under this subsection 20250SB0129PN1013 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 t o the Adjutant General and the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives no later than January 30, 2026 , and each year thereafter.Section 2. The amendment or addition of 51 Pa.C.S. § 704(a)(1) and (2) and (b)(1) and (2) shall apply upon the expiration of a member's term on the advisory council appointed by the Governor before the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0129PN1013 - 4 - 1234567891011